Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 13 PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM
§ 59-1355. Postretirement allowance adjustments.

Each retirement allowance payment shall, subject to the provisions of this section, equal the inflation factor for the adjustment year of payment multiplied by the amount of the retirement allowance payment for March of the previous year. During any adjustment year for which the ratio of the consumer price index for the index month of the previous year to the consumer price index for the index month of the second previous year is not more than one hundred one percent (101%), the inflation factor shall be such ratio or ninety-four percent (94%), whichever is greater, which inflation factor shall not be subject to legislative approval. Otherwise the inflation factor during such adjustment year shall be one hundred one percent (101%), except that the board, with legislative approval, may put into effect a greater factor which is no more than such ratio or one hundred six percent (106%), whichever is smaller, if it finds the value of the actuarial assets of the system to be no less than its actuarial liabilities, including those created by the increased factor. The actuarial assets comprise the sum of the actuarial present value of the amortization payments determined in accordance with the requirements of section 59-1322(5), Idaho Code, plus the amounts determined in paragraphs (e)(ii), (e)(iii), (e)(iv), (e)(v) and (g) of section 59-1322(4), Idaho Code. The actuarial liabilities are as defined in paragraph (e)(i) of section 59-1322(4), Idaho Code. The board’s proposed inflation factor for any adjustment year shall be communicated by letter to the legislature by not later than January 15 prior to that year.

During an adjustment year following one in which there was at least one (1) retirement allowance payment but none in March, each retirement allowance payment shall equal the partial factor multiplied by the amount of the monthly retirement allowance payment in the earlier year. The partial factor shall equal 1.000 plus one-twelfth (1/12) of the product of the number of months in the earlier adjustment year in which member contributions were not made and the excess, if any, of the inflation factor for the later year over 1.000.

During an adjustment year following one in which there was no retirement allowance payment, each retirement allowance payment shall equal the initial retirement allowance multiplied by the bridging factor between the first day of the month following the member’s final contribution and the date of the first retirement allowance payment.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the bridging factor between any two (2) dates shall be the ratio of the amounts of retirement allowance payable on the two (2) dates for any member who retired on the earlier date immediately following his final contribution.

For any member not making a final contribution subsequent to 1974 whose initial retirement allowance is a minimum allowance provided in section 59-1342(1)(b) or 59-1342(2)(b), Idaho Code, the bridging factor shall be computed as if the member had made his final contribution in 1974.
(4) The consumer price index shall be that for all urban consumers published by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

(5) The adjustments provided under this section shall in no event reduce a benefit payment below its initial amount.

(6) An adjustment year shall extend from March through the following February. The index month is October for adjustment years commencing before March, 1990, and is August for subsequent adjustment years.

(7) If, by the forty-fifth day of any regular legislative session, the legislature has not adopted a concurrent resolution rejecting or amending the proposed adjustments of the board allowed in subsections (1) and (8) of this section, such action on the part of the legislature shall constitute legislative approval of the board’s adjustments.

(8) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the board may grant a postretirement allowance adjustment for any previous year or years up to the full amount of the increase in the consumer price index for that year or those years, as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

§ 59-1356. Reemployment of retired members.

If an early retired member is reemployed with the same employer within ninety (90) days from retiring, or the early retired member is guaranteed reemployment with the same employer, the member shall be considered to have continued in the status of an employee and not to have separated from service. Any retirement allowance payments received by the retired member shall be repaid to the system and the retirement shall be negated. The month of last contribution prior to the negated retirement and the month of initial contribution upon return to reemployment shall be considered consecutive months of contributions in the determination of an appropriate salary base period upon subsequent retirement. A retired member is not considered to have separated from service if he continues performing services for the same employer in any capacity including, but not limited to, independent contractor, leased employee, or temporary services.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, when a retired member meets the definition of an employee as defined in section 59-1302(14)(A)(a), Idaho Code, any benefit payable on behalf of such member shall be suspended and any contributions payable by such member under sections 59-1331 through 59-1334, Idaho Code, shall again commence. The suspended benefit, as adjusted pursuant to section 59-1355, Idaho Code, shall resume upon subsequent retirement, along with a separate allowance computed with respect to only that salary and service credited during the period of reemployment. Any death benefit that becomes payable under the suspended benefit shall be payable under section 59-1361(2), Idaho Code. Any death benefit that becomes payable with respect to salary and service accrued during the period of reemployment shall be payable under section 59-1361(3), Idaho Code, if the member dies during the period of reemployment.

If a retired member who is receiving a benefit that is not reduced under section 59-1346, Idaho Code, and who has been retired for more than six (6) months, again becomes employed as defined in this section and section 59-1302(14)(A)(b), Idaho Code, as a result of being elected to a public office other than an office held prior to retirement, the retired member may elect to continue receiving benefits and not accrue additional service, in which event no contributions shall be made by the member or employer during such reemployment and any benefit payable on behalf of such member shall continue.

If a retired schoolteacher or administrator who retired on or after age sixty (60) years, or a public safety officer who retired, and is receiving a benefit that is not reduced under section 59-1346, Idaho Code, again becomes an employee as defined in this section and section 59-1302(14), Idaho Code, as a result of returning to employment with a school district as provided in section 33-1004H, Idaho Code, the retired member may elect to continue receiving benefits and not accrue additional service, in which event no contributions shall be made by the member during such reemployment and any benefit payable on behalf of such member shall continue. However, the school district shall pay the required employer contribution for that employee to the public employee retirement system.

It is the responsibility of each employer to immediately report to the retirement board the employment of any retired member so that benefit payments can be suspended as provided in this section. If an employer fails to properly report the employment of a retired member and it results in the retirement board making benefit payments that should have been suspended, the employer shall, in addition to paying delinquent employee and employer contributions from the date of eligibility, also be responsible for repaying to the retirement board the benefit payments made to the retired member that should have been suspended, plus interest. The employer may then recoup such payments from the retired member.

For purposes of this section, “same employer” means the employer for which the retired member last worked prior to retirement.

§ 59-1357. Inactive member eligible for separation benefit. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1358. Computation of separation benefits.

The separation benefit shall equal the excess, if any, of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time the benefit becomes payable over the aggregate of all retirement allowance payments ever made to the member.

§ 59-1359. Separation benefits.

The separation benefit, if any, shall become payable upon the written request of an inactive member who has been separated from employment. If the person who received a separation benefit is reemployed or reinstated by the same employer within ninety (90) days or is guaranteed a right to employment or reinstatement with the same employer, the person shall repay to the system any separation benefit paid.

A separation benefit shall automatically be payable three (3) years after a person becomes an inactive member if the inactive member is not a vested member, has accumulated contributions of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and has been separated from employment and is not reemployed or reinstated by the same employer within ninety (90) days.

For purposes of this section, “separated from employment” means the inactive member terminated all employment with the employer. An inactive member is not considered to have separated from employment if he continues performing services for the same employer in any capacity including, but not limited to, independent contractor, leased employee, or temporary services. For purposes of this section, “same employer” means the employer for which the person last worked prior to being separated from employment.

Any member may elect to have eligible rollover distributions paid directly to a specified eligible retirement plan as required by 26 U.S.C. section 401(a)(31).

§ 59-1360. Cessation of membership — Reinstatement.

A person shall cease to be a member when the person’s accumulated contributions are paid to the person. After again becoming an employee the member may reinstate previous credited service by repaying to the retirement fund the full amount of all prior accumulated contributions provided such repayment includes payment of interest as determined by the board.

§ 59-1361. Computation of death benefits — Method of payment — Optional death benefit.

The death benefit of an active or inactive member not vested at time of death shall equal the excess, if any, of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time the benefit becomes payable over the aggregate of all benefit payments ever made to the member.

The death benefit of an early or service retired member shall equal the excess, if any, of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time the member retired over the aggregate of all retirement allowance payments ever made to the member, the member’s named contingent annuitant, and the optional death benefit recipient, if any.

The death benefit of a vested member who, at the time of death is either active, inactive, or a disability retiree, shall equal the excess, if any, of two hundred percent (200%) of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of death over the aggregate of all benefit payments ever made to the member and the optional death benefit recipient, if any.

The death benefit, if any, will be paid to the member’s designated beneficiary who is surviving the member at the time the benefit becomes payable. If no beneficiary has been designated or the designated beneficiary has predeceased the member, the death benefit will be paid to the surviving spouse, and if there is no surviving spouse it will be paid in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the state of Idaho as they may then be in effect. The designated beneficiary may waive, in writing as required by the board, any death benefit otherwise payable. If the designated beneficiary waives the death benefit, it will be paid as if the designated beneficiary predeceased the member.

When the surviving spouse of a vested member is entitled to a death benefit under subsection (3) of this section, the surviving spouse may elect either an allowance as provided in option 1 under section 59-1351, Idaho Code, or a one (1) time lump sum death benefit payment as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The initial retirement allowance upon which such optional retirement allowance is based shall be calculated as if the member had retired immediately before his death. If the member is not then eligible to receive a service or early retirement allowance, such initial retirement allowance shall equal the actuarial equivalent of the retirement allowance payable when the member would first be eligible for service or early retirement, calculated as if he had separated from service immediately before his death.

§ 59-1361A. Public safety officer death benefits.

On and after July 1, 2003, in the event a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty, a death benefit in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be payable as provided in this section to the officer’s surviving spouse or, in the event there is no surviving spouse, divided among the officer’s dependent children.

Application for benefits under this chapter shall be made to the retirement board. No benefit shall be payable unless it is established, as determined by the retirement board, that:

The officer’s death occurred in the line of duty as defined in regulations issued by the United States department of justice pursuant to 42 U.S.C. section 3796, except as modified by the retirement board;

The death was not caused by the intentional misconduct of the officer or by such officer’s intentional infliction of injury;

The officer was not voluntarily intoxicated at the time of death; and

Benefit payments will not be paid to a person whose actions were a substantial contributing factor to the death of the officer.

As used in this section:

“Dependent child” means a surviving natural or legally adopted child who is under twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of the officer’s death. Benefits to dependent children shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of the Idaho uniform transfers to minors act, as set forth in chapter 8, title 68, Idaho Code; provided that when there are multiple dependent children, the benefit shall be divided equally among them.

“Public safety officer” means an active member of the retirement system who when injured:

Was designated as a police officer member under section 59-1303, Idaho Code, and had been treated as such for contribution purposes;

Was a “firefighter” as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho Code; or

Was a “paid firefighter” as defined in section 72-1403(A), Idaho Code.

Benefits payable under this section:

Are separate from and independent of any benefits payable under section 59-1361, Idaho Code;

Are not dependent on years of service or age of the public safety officer; and

Shall not be subject to state income taxes.

The costs of providing this benefit, as determined by the board, shall be paid by the employers of public safety officers as an additional contribution component separate and distinct from all other obligations under this chapter. Such costs will be paid in a manner as determined by the board.

§ 59-1362. Purchase of active duty service in the armed forces.

If a member is entitled to reemployment rights related to the member’s active duty service under the uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act of 1994 (USERRA), as amended, any period of that active duty service that is not eligible to be credited as military service under section 59-1302(23), Idaho Code, may be credited as membership service if the member pays employee contributions for that period as required in this section.

The member must pay employee contributions or enter into an agreement to do so and begin making payments within ninety (90) days from the date of reemployment. If the member pays employee contributions or enters into an agreement to do so, the employer will be responsible for paying employer contributions for the same period within thirty (30) days thereafter. Both employee and employer contributions will be based upon compensation the member would have received but for the period of active duty service.

The member may have up to five (5) years to repay employee contributions, with interest accruing only from the date of return from active duty service. If the member terminates employment prior to repaying all the employee contributions related to the eligible period as agreed, membership service will be granted only for the period for which contributions were paid.

All periods of active duty service that do not qualify as “military service” under section 59-1302(23), Idaho Code, or for purchase of membership service under this section, must be purchased under section 59-1363, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1363. Purchase of membership service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an active or inactive member who is vested may purchase up to forty-eight (48) months of membership service.

The cost of purchases under this section shall be the full actuarial costs of the service as determined by the board. The board may provide for payment options, including periodic payments, but no service shall be credited until payment has been made in full. The member shall be solely responsible for the costs of such purchased service, except that an employer may participate in the costs at its option.

In no event shall any member be allowed to purchase in the aggregate more than forty-eight (48) months of membership service under this section.

§ 59-1365. Voluntary unused sick leave pool.

The board is authorized to establish and administer an unused sick leave pool for the voluntary participation of employer units not eligible to participate in other statutorily created sick leave arrangements. The pool shall be funded entirely by the contributions of participating employer units and the board may charge reasonable administrative expenses for administration. The requirements, rates and parameters for participation in the pool will be set forth by rules of the board.

§ 59-1371. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, each of the terms defined shall have the meaning given in this section or in section 59-1302, Idaho Code, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context.

“Accumulated teacher member contributions” means the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a teacher member on or before July 1, 1965 and credited to his individual account in the savings annuity savings fund, together with interest credited to said account to such date.

“Board” means the retirement board of the employee system.

“Date of establishment” means July 1, 1967 for school employees.

“Funding agent” means the funding agent of the employee system.

“Prior service” means any period, prior to July 1, 1965, of military service or of employment for the state of Idaho or any political subdivision or other employer as defined by this chapter of each school employee who is an active member or in military service or on leave of absence on the date of establishment.

“Employee system” means the retirement system created by and existing through the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

“School employee” means any employee of any school district or any public community college district or Boise State University including each member of the teachers system, subject to the provisions of section 59-1302(14), Idaho Code, but shall not include any person who is an annuitant of the teachers system.

“Teacher member” means a member of the teachers system on July 1, 1967, subject to the provisions of section 59-1302(14), Idaho Code.

“Teachers system” means the retirement system created by and existing through chapter 13, title 33, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1372. Transfer of all assets, liabilities, duties, obligations and rights to employee system.

All of the funds, assets, liabilities, duties, obligations and rights of the board of trustees and members of the teachers system shall be transferred to and integrated with the employee system on July 1, 1967. The board of trustees of the teachers system is by this chapter abolished. Benefits payable to annuitants and beneficiaries of the teachers system shall become the obligation of the employee system on July 1, 1967 and shall be paid in the same amount as established by the teachers system. The funds of the teachers system are by this chapter abolished. Cash on hand in said funds shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the clearing account of the employee system. Evidence of indebtedness arising from invested money of said funds shall be transferred by the custodians thereof to the funding agent. The money and property of said funds shall become the money and property of the employee system.

§ 59-1373. Accumulated teacher member contributions — Remaining contributions — Membership service credit.

Accumulated teacher member contributions, unless previously withdrawn, shall be paid to teacher members prior to January 1, 1968, by the board from the clearing account of the employee system. All remaining contributions shall be considered as accumulated contributions as defined in section 59-1302(3), Idaho Code. Each month of service of any teacher member between July 1, 1965 and July 1, 1967 during which the teacher member was a member of the teachers system shall be deemed to be membership service.

§ 59-1374. Employers — Members — Exceptions.

All school districts, public community college districts and Boise State University shall become employers pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, on July 1, 1967, except as herein otherwise provided. School employees shall become members pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, on July 1, 1967, except as herein otherwise provided. Provided, however, that teacher members employed by the agricultural extension service of the college of agriculture of the University of Idaho shall be deemed to be employees of the state of Idaho notwithstanding the provisions of section 59-1302(14)(B)(e), Idaho Code, and may elect to participate or be excluded as members of the system in accordance with rules of the board. All public charter schools created pursuant to chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code, shall be employers pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code. The Idaho digital learning academy created pursuant to chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code, shall be an employer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code. The Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind created pursuant to chapter 34, title 33, Idaho Code, shall be an employer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1375. Annuitants — Contribution in lieu of the requirement of six months of membership service.

A person who became an annuitant of the teachers system on or after March 29, 1965, and who had met the requirements for service or disability retirement on the date such person became an annuitant, except for the requirement of six (6) months of membership service, shall be eligible for service or disability retirement on January 1, 1968 by contributing to the employee system pursuant to rules of the board an amount equal to the sum such person would have contributed during six (6) months of membership service computed on the basis of the salary such person received on the date such person became an annuitant. This contribution shall be in lieu of the requirement of six (6) months of membership service. The amount so contributed shall not be included in the computation of disability or service retirement allowance.

§ 59-1376. Benefits to teacher members not to be less than those paid if system had not been integrated.

Benefits paid teacher members who became eligible for benefits under the employee system shall never be less than the benefits such teacher members would have received as annuitants or that their beneficiaries would have received from the teachers system if the systems had not been integrated.

§ 59-1377 — 59-1380. [Reserved.]

As used in this chapter, each of the terms defined shall have the meaning given in this section or in section 59-1302, Idaho Code, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context.

“Board” means the retirement board of the employee system.

“City member” means a person receiving benefits or establishing the right to receive benefits from a city system.

“City system” means the Boise city employee’s retirement system and any policeman’s retirement system established and operated by virtue of any city ordinance, charter, or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15, title 50, Idaho Code.

“Employee system” means the retirement system created by and existing through the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

“Employer” means a city having a city system.

§ 59-1382. City ordinance electing merger — Contract with board.

Any city having a city system may elect to merge its city system with the employee system by the enactment of an ordinance declaring such intention; the provisions of section 50-1503, Idaho Code, and section 50-1524, Idaho Code, notwithstanding. Thereupon the board of the employee system may upon such terms as are set forth in a contract between the board and employer integrate the city system of the employer into the employee system.

§ 59-1383. Transfer of assets, liabilities, duties, and rights to state employee system — Governing board of city system abolished.

On its date of establishment all of the funds, assets, liabilities, duties, obligations and rights of the governing board of the city system and of all city members being integrated into the employee system shall be transferred to the employee system. The governing board of such a city system is by this chapter abolished. On and after the date of establishment, benefits payable to annuitants and beneficiaries of such a city system shall become the obligation of the employee system and shall be paid in the same amount as established by such a city system, except that on and after the date of establishment future monthly benefits shall be subject to the provisions of section 59-1356 [59-1355], Idaho Code. The funds of such a city system are by this chapter abolished. The custodian of the fund of such a city system shall transfer all cash on hand in such fund to the state treasurer for deposit in the clearing account of the employee system, and all evidence of indebtedness arising from invested money of said fund to the funding agent as designated by the board. The money and property of such funds shall become the money and property of the employee system.

§ 59-1384. Benefits not reduced.

Benefits paid city members or their beneficiaries shall never be less than the benefits they would have received from the city systems if such systems had not been integrated with the employee system.

§ 59-1385. Contributions by employer — Adjustment to equalize benefits payable and assets transferred — Corporate tax by city to pay contributions.

Each employer shall contribute to the cost of benefits under the system, pursuant to section 59-1322, Idaho Code. On the date of establishment and from time to time thereafter, the board shall conduct studies of those benefits payable under section 59-1384, Idaho Code, which are in excess of those otherwise earned in accordance with chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code. If, for any such employer, such study indicates the value of such benefits exceeds the amount of money and property transferred in accordance with section 59-1383, Idaho Code, said amount being adjusted for interest and for any previous payments in accordance with this section and section 59-1384, Idaho Code, such excess value shall be computed as an additional contribution to be paid by such employer. In the event said amount so adjusted shall exceed said value of such benefits, the excess shall be immediately payable to such employer by the employee system.

Each such employer may levy a special tax on all assessed property within its corporate limits solely for the purpose of paying all or a portion of such contributions.

§ 59-1386 — 59-1390. [Reserved.]

As used in sections 59-1391 through and including 59-1399, Idaho Code, each of the terms defined shall have the meaning given in this section or in section 59-1302, Idaho Code, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the context.

“Board” means the retirement board of the employee system.

“Firefighter member” means a person or beneficiary who, prior to October 1, 1980, was receiving benefits or establishing the right to receive benefits from the firefighters’ retirement fund.

“Firefighters’ retirement fund” means the retirement system created by and existing pursuant to chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code.

“Employee system” means the retirement system created and existing pursuant to chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

“Employer” means a city or fire district that employs paid firefighters who are participating in the firefighters’ retirement fund on October 1, 1980.

“Paid firefighter” means any individual, male or female, excluding office secretaries on the payroll of any city or fire district in the state of Idaho who devotes his or her principal time of employment to the care, operation, maintenance or the requirements of a regularly constituted fire department of such city or fire district in the state of Idaho.

§ 59-1392. Transfer of all assets, liabilities, duties, obligations and rights of the firefighters’ retirement fund to the employee system.

All of the funds, assets, liabilities, duties, obligations and rights provided for by chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, shall be transferred to, and integrated with, the employee system on October 1, 1980. Benefits payable to firefighter members shall become the obligation of the employee system on October 1, 1980. Cash on hand in the firefighters’ retirement fund shall be deposited to the credit of the public employee retirement fund as provided in section 59-1311, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1393. Contributions.

Employers shall deduct, withhold and remit contributions from the salaries of paid firefighters who were employed as paid firefighters prior to October 1, 1980, as provided by section 72-1431, Idaho Code.

Employers shall make payments required by the provisions of section 72-1432, Idaho Code, for all paid firefighters employed prior to October 1, 1980.

Employers shall deduct, withhold and remit contributions from the salaries of paid firefighters, whose employment begins on or after October 1, 1980, and make employer contributions for such paid firefighters, as provided in chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, on and after October 1, 1980.

§ 59-1394. Excess costs — Additional contributions.

In addition to the employee and employer contributions required by chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, additional contributions shall be required to fund the provisions of section 59-1397, Idaho Code. These costs shall be borne by employers and by the state of Idaho as hereinafter provided.

Fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipts by the state of the tax on fire insurance premiums, as provided by section 41-402, Idaho Code, is hereby perpetually appropriated to the public employee retirement account [fund] for the purpose of partially funding the benefit payment requirements imposed by the provisions of chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code.

The board shall conduct studies from time to time of the benefits prescribed by section 59-1397, Idaho Code, to determine the additional contributions required to fund the rights conferred by chapter 14, title 72, Idaho Code, above and beyond the initial contribution from the fire insurance premium tax required by subsection (1)(a) of this section. If such studies indicate the value of the benefits exceeds the required contributions otherwise prescribed, the board shall establish an additional contribution rate necessary to bring the amounts into balance. The cost of such additional contribution shall be borne equally by the employers through additional contributions and the state of Idaho through the fire insurance premium tax. In addition to appropriation of the fire insurance premium tax contained in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the amount of the gross receipts by the state of the tax on fire insurance premiums, as provided by section 41-402, Idaho Code, necessary to match dollar for dollar the additional contribution required of employers is hereby perpetually appropriated commencing July 1, 1980 to the public employee retirement account [fund] for the purpose of subsection (1)(b) of this section. If the matching funds herein provided equal one hundred percent (100%) of the gross receipts from the fire insurance premium tax, the employers shall contribute the balance of the monies required to meet the required contribution rate. The additional contribution rate from the employers commencing October 1, 1980 shall be ten percent (10%) of the pay period salary of each paid firefighter until next determined by the board.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent the board from contracting with employers to provide a schedule of contributions which will retire any excess cost over a given period of time, not to exceed fifty (50) years. In the event that such agreements are reached, the amount of the fire insurance premium tax necessary to match additional employer contributions is continuously appropriated for that purpose.

§ 59-1395. Membership rights and duties.

The rights, benefits, memberships, payments, duties and obligations of paid firefighters whose employment begins on or after October 1, 1980, with respect to membership and participation in the employee system shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1396. Limit on separation benefit.

When a firefighter member who was employed prior to October 1, 1980, terminates employment and seeks return of his or her accumulated contributions, such contributions shall be returned as provided under the provisions of section 72-1444, Idaho Code.

When a paid firefighter whose employment began on or after October 1, 1980, terminates employment and seeks return of his or her accumulated contributions, such contributions shall be returned as provided by sections 59-1358 and 59-1359, Idaho Code.

§ 59-1397. Benefits payable.

The combined rights and benefits of paid firefighters who were employed prior to October 1, 1980, shall not be less than the rights and benefits they would have received from the firefighters’ retirement fund, had the fund not been integrated with the employee system.

§ 59-1398. Membership in social security.

The provisions of the federal social security system are hereby made applicable to all paid firefighters hired for the first time on or after October 1, 1980.

§ 59-1399. Cooperation of state insurance fund.

The director of the state insurance fund is hereby authorized and directed to cooperate with and furnish necessary information to the board to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

§ 59-1381. Merger of city systems into state employee system — Definitions.

§ 59-1391. Definitions.